Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-507
Public land; prohibited acts; penalty; temporary restraining order or injunction.

(1) Any person who knowingly and willfully appropriates, excavates, injures, or destroys any archaeological resource on public land without written permission from the State Archaeology Office is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) When the State Archaeology Office has cause to believe that a person has engaged in or is engaging in any unlawful conduct prescribed in this section, it may apply for and obtain, in an action in the appropriate district court of this state, a temporary restraining order or injunction, or both, pursuant to the Nebraska rules of civil procedure prohibiting such person from continuing such practices, or engaging therein, or doing any act in furtherance thereof.

Laws 2005, LB 211, § 7.